North Dakota statutes. TITLE 23 Health and Safety
CHAPTER 23-01 State Department of Health
23-01-05.2.
Epinephrine prescription, distribution, possession, or use — Immunity from liability.

As used in this section:

“Epinephrine” means a single-use disposable device that automatically injects a premeasured dose of epinephrine.

“Health care professional” means a licensed or certified health care professional who is working within the scope of practice for that profession. The term may include a physician, physician assistant, advanced practice registered nurse, and pharmacist acting in the professional’s scope of practice.

A health care professional acting in good faith may directly or by standing order prescribe, distribute, or dispense epinephrine, if the health care professional provides training to:

An individual at risk of experiencing a severe allergic reaction; or

A family member, friend, or other person in a position to assist an individual at risk of experiencing a severe allergic reaction.

A person acting in good faith may receive or possess epinephrine if that person is:

An individual at risk of experiencing a severe allergic reaction; or

A family member, friend, or other person in a position to assist an individual at risk of experiencing a severe allergic reaction.

An individual acting in good faith may self-administer epinephrine or administer epinephrine to another individual who the administering individual suspects is at risk of experiencing a severe allergic reaction.

A person may receive, possess, or administer epinephrine under subsection 3 or 4, regardless of whether the person is the individual for or the person to which the epinephrine is prescribed, distributed, or dispensed. A person in possession of epinephrine which is acting in good faith may provide training on how to use epinephrine.

A health care professional who prescribes, distributes, trains on the use of, or dispenses epinephrine as authorized under this section is not subject to professional discipline for such action. This section does not expand the scope of practice of a health care professional.

A person that prescribes, distributes, dispenses, receives, possesses, trains in the use of, or administers epinephrine as authorized under this section is immune from civil and criminal liability for such action. This subsection provides immunity to the person responsible for the site on which the epinephrine is located. Immunity from liability or discipline under this subsection does not apply if the person’s actions constitute recklessness, gross negligence, or intentional misconduct.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 247, § 1; 2011, ch. 181, § 1; 2021, ch. 193, § 1, effective April 22, 2021; 2021, ch. 352, § 109, effective September 1, 2022.

Note.

Section 23-01-05.2 was amended 2 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly.

Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 1 of Chapter 193, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2248; and Section 109 of Chapter 352, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1247.

23-01-05.3.
Immunization data.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

The state department of health may establish an immunization information system and may require the childhood immunizations specified in subsection 1 of section 23-07-17.1 and other information be reported to the department. The state department of health may only require the reporting of childhood immunizations and other data upon completion of the immunization information reporting system. A health care provider who administers a childhood immunization shall report the patient’s identifying information, the immunization that is administered, and other required information to the department. The report must be submitted using electronic media, and must contain the data content and use the format and codes specified by the department.

If a health care provider fails to submit an immunization report required under this section within four weeks of vaccination:

That health care provider may not order or receive any vaccine from the North Dakota immunization program until that provider submits all reports required under this section.

The state department of health shall make a report to that health care provider’s occupational licensing entity outlining that provider’s failure to comply with the reporting requirements under this section.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a health care provider, elementary or secondary school, early childhood facility, public or private postsecondary educational institution, city or county board of health, district health unit, and the state health officer may exchange immunization data in any manner with one another. Immunization data that may be exchanged under this section is limited to the date and type of immunization administered to a patient and may be exchanged regardless of the date of the immunization.

The state department of health may not create, administer, provide, or contract for electronic machine-readable code or a vaccine passport.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 248, § 1; 2005, ch. 230, § 1; 2007, ch. 4, § 6; 2011, ch. 182, § 1; 2021, 1st Sp. Sess. ch. 558, § 1, effective November 15, 2021.

23-01-05.3.
Immunization data.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

The department of health and human services may establish an immunization information system and may require the childhood immunizations specified in subsection 1 of section 23-07-17.1 and other information be reported to the department. The department of health and human services may only require the reporting of childhood immunizations and other data upon completion of the immunization information reporting system. A health care provider who administers a childhood immunization shall report the patient’s identifying information, the immunization that is administered, and other required information to the department. The report must be submitted using electronic media, and must contain the data content and use the format and codes specified by the department.

If a health care provider fails to submit an immunization report required under this section within four weeks of vaccination:

That health care provider may not order or receive any vaccine from the North Dakota immunization program until that provider submits all reports required under this section.

The department of health and human services shall make a report to that health care provider’s occupational licensing entity outlining that provider’s failure to comply with the reporting requirements under this section.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a health care provider, elementary or secondary school, early childhood facility, public or private postsecondary educational institution, city or county board of health, district health unit, and the state health officer may exchange immunization data in any manner with one another. Immunization data that may be exchanged under this section is limited to the date and type of immunization administered to a patient and may be exchanged regardless of the date of the immunization.

The department of health and human services may not create, administer, provide, or contract for electronic machine-readable code or a vaccine passport.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 248, § 1; 2005, ch. 230, § 1; 2007, ch. 4, § 6; 2011, ch. 182, § 1; 2021, 1st Sp. Sess. ch. 558, § 1, effective November 15, 2021; 2021, ch. 352, § 110, effective September 1, 2022.

23-01-05.4.
Department to employ state forensic examiner — Qualifications — Duties.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

The state department of health may employ and establish the qualifications and compensation of the state forensic examiner. The state forensic examiner must be a physician who is board-certified or board-eligible in forensic pathology, who is licensed to practice in this state, and who is in good standing in the profession. The state forensic examiner shall:

Exercise all authority conferred upon the coroner under chapter 11-19.1 and any other law;

Consult with local coroners on the performance of their duties as coroners;

Conduct investigations into the cause of death of and perform autopsies on any deceased human body whenever requested to do so by the acting local county coroner or the local state’s attorney;

Provide training and educational materials to local county coroners, law enforcement, and any other person the state forensic examiner deems necessary;

Maintain complete records of the cause, manner, and mode of death necessary for accurate health statistics and for public health purposes; and

Perform other duties assigned by the state health officer.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 114, § 6; 2009, ch. 212, § 15.

23-01-05.4.
Department to employ state forensic examiner — Qualifications — Duties.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

The department of health and human services may employ and establish the qualifications and compensation of the state forensic examiner. The state forensic examiner must be a physician who is board-certified or board-eligible in forensic pathology, who is licensed to practice in this state, and who is in good standing in the profession. The state forensic examiner shall:

Exercise all authority conferred upon the coroner under chapter 11-19.1 and any other law;

Consult with local coroners on the performance of their duties as coroners;

Conduct investigations into the cause of death of and perform autopsies on any deceased human body whenever requested to do so by the acting local county coroner or the local state’s attorney;

Provide training and educational materials to local county coroners, law enforcement, and any other person the state forensic examiner deems necessary;

Maintain complete records of the cause, manner, and mode of death necessary for accurate health statistics and for public health purposes; and

Perform other duties assigned by the state health officer.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 114, § 6; 2009, ch. 212, § 15; 2021, ch. 352, § 111, effective September 1, 2022.

23-01-05.5.
Autopsy reports — Confidential — Exceptions.

As used in this section:

“Autopsy report” means the report of the forensic examiner or the examiner’s designee on the post-mortem examination of a deceased individual to determine the cause and manner of death, including any written analysis, diagram, photograph, or toxicological test results.

“Report of death” means the official findings on the cause of death and manner of death issued by the state forensic examiner, the examiner’s designee, county coroner, or pathologist performing an autopsy ordered by a county coroner or by the state forensic examiner and which is the face page of the autopsy report identifying the decedent and stating the cause of death and manner of death.

An autopsy report and any working papers and notes relating to an autopsy report are confidential and may be disclosed only as permitted by this section. The report of death is subject to disclosure as follows:

The next of kin or authorized representative requesting the report of death is responsible for providing to the state forensic examiner or the examiner’s designee satisfactory proof of relationship to the deceased and contact information for notification of the report of death.

When in receipt of the information in subdivision a, the state forensic examiner, examiner’s designee, county coroner, or pathologist who performed the autopsy shall make a good faith effort to immediately notify the decedent’s next of kin or authorized representative of the availability of the report of death. The notification or attempts to notify the next of kin or authorized representative must be recorded and must precede any public disclosure of the report of death.

The report of death becomes a public record eight days after the report of death is finalized.

Subject to the limitations on the disclosure of an autopsy photograph or other visual image or video or audio recording of an autopsy required under section 44-04-18.18, any working papers and notes relating to a final autopsy report may be disclosed pursuant to a court order and as otherwise expressly provided by law.

The state forensic examiner or the examiner’s designee shall disclose a copy of the autopsy report:

To any county coroner, including a coroner in any state or Canadian province, with jurisdiction over the death, and the coroner may use or disclose these records for purposes of an investigation, inquest, or prosecution.

To any state’s attorney or criminal justice agency, including a prosecutor or criminal justice agency of the United States, any state, or any Canadian province, with jurisdiction over an investigation of the death and the state’s attorney or criminal justice agency may use or disclose these records for the purposes of an investigation or prosecution.

To workforce safety and insurance if the death is related to the decedent’s work, and to any other workers’ compensation or other similar program, established by law, that provides benefits for work-related injuries or illness without regard to fault if there is no criminal investigation.

To the child fatality review panel if there is no active criminal investigation.

In accordance with a court order.

The state forensic examiner or the examiner’s designee upon request shall disclose a copy of the autopsy report to:

The decedent’s personal representative and to the decedent’s spouse, child, or parent, upon proof of the relationship, if there is no active criminal investigation.

A physician or hospital who treated the deceased immediately prior to death if there is no active criminal investigation.

An insurance company upon proof that the decedent’s life was covered by a policy issued by the company if there is no active criminal investigation.

The food and drug administration, the national transportation safety board, the occupational health and safety administration, and any other federal or state agency with authority to obtain an autopsy report to investigate a death resulting from the decedent’s type of injury or illness.

A professional or research organization collecting data to initiate or advance death investigation standards, after the identifiers necessary to create a limited data set under title 45, Code of Federal Regulations, part 164, section 514, subsection e have been removed from the report.

The forensic examiner, the examiner’s designee, any county coroner or county medical coroner, and any public employee who, in good faith, discloses autopsy findings, an autopsy report, or other information relating to an autopsy report or cause of death to a person who the public official or employee reasonably believes is entitled to that information under this section is immune from any liability, civil or criminal, for making that disclosure. For the purposes of any proceeding, the good faith of any public employee who makes a disclosure under this section is presumed.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 212, § 16; 2017, ch. 185, § 1, effective August 1, 2017.

23-01-06.
Biennial report — Contents.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

The state health officer shall submit a biennial report to the governor and the secretary of state in accordance with section 54-06-04. In addition to any requirements established pursuant to section 54-06-04, the report must cover the following subjects:

The activities of the various divisions, the work accomplished during the two years covered by the report, and an analysis of the program of each of the divisions.

The expenditures of the state department of health.

The expenditures in each county board of health or the district board of health.

Any reports relating to the hospital program as required by the health council.

Source:

S.L. 1885, ch. 63, § 13; R.C. 1895, § 251; R.C. 1899, § 251; R.C. 1905, § 257; C.L. 1913, § 402; R.C. 1943, § 23-0106; S.L. 1947, ch. 200, § 6; 1957 Supp., § 23-0106; S.L. 1963, ch. 346, § 23; 1973, ch. 403, § 16; 1975, ch. 466, § 17; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 1995, ch. 350, § 16.

23-01-06.
Biennial report — Contents.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

The department of health and human services shall submit a biennial report to the governor and the secretary of state in accordance with section 54-06-04. In addition to any requirements established pursuant to section 54-06-04, the report must cover the following subjects:

The activities of the health division, the work accomplished during the two years covered by the report, and an analysis of the program of the health division.

The expenditures of the health division.

The expenditures in each county board of health or the district board of health.

Any reports relating to the hospital program as required by the health council.

Source:

S.L. 1885, ch. 63, § 13; R.C. 1895, § 251; R.C. 1899, § 251; R.C. 1905, § 257; C.L. 1913, § 402; R.C. 1943, § 23-0106; S.L. 1947, ch. 200, § 6; 1957 Supp., § 23-0106; S.L. 1963, ch. 346, § 23; 1973, ch. 403, § 16; 1975, ch. 466, § 17; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 1995, ch. 350, § 16; 2021, ch. 352, § 112, effective September 1, 2022.

23-01-07.
Structure of department. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1993, ch. 218, § 10.

23-01-08.
Directors of divisions — Deputy — Appointment, salary, duties.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

The state health officer shall appoint directors of the various divisions of the department and shall determine the salary, within the limits of legislative appropriations to the department and in conformity with the state merit system, to be received by such persons. The duties of such director must be those prescribed by the state health officer. The state health officer may appoint a deputy state health officer. A deputy state health officer who does not hold a health-related degree may not individually issue an order regarding public health unless the order is cosigned by a physician who is employed by the department or cosigned by the state epidemiologist. The deputy state health officer serves at the pleasure of the state health officer.

Source:

R.C. 1943, § 23-0108; S.L. 1947, ch. 200, § 8; 1957 Supp., § 23-0108; S.L. 2003, ch. 208, § 1.

Cross-References.

Employees subject to merit system, see N.D.C.C. § 54-44.3-30.

23-01-08.
Directors of divisions — Deputy — Appointment, salary, duties.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

The executive director of the department of health and human services or designee shall appoint directors of the various divisions of the department and shall determine the salary, within the limits of legislative appropriations to the department and in conformity with the state merit system, to be received by such persons. The duties of such director must be those prescribed by the executive director of the department of health and human services or designee. The executive director of the department of health and human services or designee may appoint a deputy state health officer. A deputy state health officer who does not hold a health-related degree may not individually issue an order regarding public health unless the order is cosigned by a physician who is employed by the department or cosigned by the state epidemiologist. The deputy state health officer serves at the pleasure of the executive director of the department of health and human services.

Source:

R.C. 1943, § 23-0108; S.L. 1947, ch. 200, § 8; 1957 Supp., § 23-0108; S.L. 2003, ch. 208, § 1; 2021, ch. 352, § 113, effective September 1, 2022.

23-01-08.1.
Criminal history background checks.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

The state department of health may require a final applicant for a job opening or a current employee with the department, as designated by the state health officer, complete a state and national criminal history record check as provided under section 12-60-24.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 98, § 3, effective August 1, 2021.

23-01-08.1.
Criminal history background checks.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

The department of health and human services may require a final applicant for a job opening or a current employee with the department, as designated by the state health officer, complete a state and national criminal history record check as provided under section 12-60-24.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 98, § 3, effective August 1, 2021.

23-01-09.
Duties of director of consolidated laboratories branch. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1993, ch. 218, § 10.

23-01-09.1.
Duties of state toxicologist. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2003, ch. 469, § 13.

23-01-10.
Office space.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

The state shall provide suitable office space in Bismarck for housing and maintaining the state department of health. Special fireproof vaults must be provided for the storage of birth and death certificates.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 227, § 7; 1925 Supp., § 403a3; S.L. 1933, ch. 189, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 23-0110; S.L. 1995, ch. 243, § 2.

Cross-References.

Health Statistics Act, see N.D.C.C. ch. 23-02.1.

23-01-10.
Office space. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The state shall provide suitable office space in Bismarck for housing and maintaining the department of health and human services. Special fireproof vaults must be provided for the storage of birth and death certificates.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 227, § 7; 1925 Supp., § 403a3; S.L. 1933, ch. 189, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 23-0110; S.L. 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2021, ch. 352, § 114, effective September 1, 2022.

23-01-11.
Acceptance of funds and right to qualify for benefits under federal laws authorized.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

The state department of health may:

Accept funds from cities, counties, the federal government, private organizations, and individuals for infancy and maternal hygiene, for other public health work and for the purpose of conducting a survey of existing medical hospitals and related institutions, planning of needed hospital construction and for construction and maintenance of such medical hospitals and related institutions. When approved by the governor of this state, the state department of health may match the same from any unexpended portion of its appropriation in accordance with specifications agreed to or required by congressional act. All infancy and maternal hygiene and public health work must be done under the supervision of the state department of health.

Adopt rules necessary to enable the state to be in compliance with any federal laws in order to qualify for any federal funds related to medical facilities or agencies licensed by the state department of health.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 116, § 3; 1925 Supp., § 396d6; S.L. 1931, ch. 262, § 1; 1933, ch. 189, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 23-0111; S.L. 1947, ch. 200, § 9; 1957 Supp., § 23-0111; S.L. 1991, ch. 261, § 1; 1995, ch. 243, § 2.

23-01-11.
Acceptance of funds and right to qualify for benefits under federal laws authorized.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

The department of health and human services may:

Accept funds from cities, counties, the federal government, private organizations, and individuals for infancy and maternal hygiene, for other public health work and for the purpose of conducting a survey of existing medical hospitals and related institutions, planning of needed hospital construction and for construction and maintenance of such medical hospitals and related institutions. When approved by the governor of this state, the department of health and human services may match the same from any unexpended portion of its appropriation in accordance with specifications agreed to or required by congressional act. All infancy and maternal hygiene and public health work must be done under the supervision of the department of health and human services.

Adopt rules necessary to enable the state to be in compliance with any federal laws in order to qualify for any federal funds related to medical facilities or agencies licensed by the department of health and human services.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 116, § 3; 1925 Supp., § 396d6; S.L. 1931, ch. 262, § 1; 1933, ch. 189, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 23-0111; S.L. 1947, ch. 200, § 9; 1957 Supp., § 23-0111; S.L. 1991, ch. 261, § 1; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2021, ch. 352, § 115, effective September 1, 2022.

23-01-12.
Hospital records to be kept at direction of state health officer.

When any person is admitted into a lying-in hospital or other institution, public or private, to which persons resort for the treatment of disease or for confinement, or to which persons are committed by process of law, the superintendent, manager, or other person in charge of such institution shall make a record of all the personal and statistical particulars relative to such person. The record must be in such form as is directed by the state health officer. In the case of any person admitted or committed for medical treatment of disease, the physician in charge shall specify for entry in the records the nature of the disease and where, in the physician’s opinion, it was contracted. The personal particulars and information required for compliance with the provisions of this section must be obtained from the individual personally if practicable, and when the information cannot be obtained from the individual, from the individual’s relatives or friends or from any other person acquainted with the facts.

Source:

S.L. 1907, ch. 270, § 17; C.L. 1913, § 450; R.C. 1943, § 23-0112.

23-01-13.
Blood plasma — Obtaining, storing, and distributing. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1991, ch. 263, § 1.

23-01-14.
State department of health authorized to transfer future accumulated fees.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

As a continuing policy, the state department of health may automatically from time to time transfer unclaimed fees on deposit with the Bank of North Dakota or other authorized depository to the state general fund when the unclaimed status has existed for a period of at least three years.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 81, § 2; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 23-0114; S.L. 1995, ch. 243, § 2.

23-01-14.
Department of health and human services authorized to transfer future accumulated fees.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

As a continuing policy, the department of health and human services may automatically from time to time transfer unclaimed fees on deposit with the Bank of North Dakota or other authorized depository to the state general fund when the unclaimed status has existed for a period of at least three years.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 81, § 2; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 23-0114; S.L. 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2021, ch. 352, § 116, effective September 1, 2022.

23-01-15.
Research studies confidential — Penalty. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

All information, records of interviews, written reports, statements, notes, memoranda, or other data procured by the state department of health, in connection with studies conducted by the state department of health, or carried on by the department jointly with other persons, agencies, or organizations, or procured by such other persons, agencies, or organizations, for the purpose of reducing the morbidity or mortality from any cause or condition of health is confidential and must be used solely for the purposes of medical or scientific research.

Such information, records, reports, statements, notes, memoranda, or other data is not admissible as evidence in any action of any kind in any court or before any other tribunal, board, agency, or person. Such information, records, reports, statements, notes, memoranda, or other data may not be exhibited nor their contents disclosed in any way, in whole or in part, by any officer or representative of the state department of health, nor by any other person, except as may be necessary for the purpose of furthering the research project to which they relate. No person participating in such research project may disclose, in any manner, the information so obtained except in strict conformity with such research project. No officer or employee of said department may interview any patient named in any such report, nor a relative of any such patient, unless the consent of the attending physician and surgeon is first obtained.

The furnishing of such information to the state department of health or its authorized representative, or to any other cooperating agency in such research project, does not subject any person, hospital, sanitarium, rest home, nursing home, or other person or agency furnishing such information, to any action for damages or other relief.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 182, §§ 1, 2; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 23-0115; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 218; 1995, ch. 243, § 2.

Collateral References.

Admissibility, in criminal cases, of evidence of electrophoresis of dried evidentiary bloodstains, 66 A.L.R.4th 588.

23-01-15.
Research studies confidential — Penalty.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

All information, records of interviews, written reports, statements, notes, memoranda, or other data procured by the department of health and human services, in connection with studies conducted by the department of health and human services, or carried on by the department jointly with other persons, agencies, or organizations, or procured by such other persons, agencies, or organizations, for the purpose of reducing the morbidity or mortality from any cause or condition of health is confidential and must be used solely for the purposes of medical or scientific research.

Such information, records, reports, statements, notes, memoranda, or other data is not admissible as evidence in any action of any kind in any court or before any other tribunal, board, agency, or person. Such information, records, reports, statements, notes, memoranda, or other data may not be exhibited nor their contents disclosed in any way, in whole or in part, by any officer or representative of the department of health and human services, nor by any other person, except as may be necessary for the purpose of furthering the research project to which they relate. No person participating in such research project may disclose, in any manner, the information so obtained except in strict conformity with such research project. No officer or employee of said department may interview any patient named in any such report, nor a relative of any such patient, unless the consent of the attending physician and surgeon is first obtained.

The furnishing of such information to the department of health and human services or its authorized representative, or to any other cooperating agency in such research project, does not subject any person, hospital, sanitarium, rest home, nursing home, or other person or agency furnishing such information, to any action for damages or other relief.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 182, §§ 1, 2; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 23-0115; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 218; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2021, ch. 352, § 117, effective September 1, 2022.

23-01-16.
Dairy products — Joint standards.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

The state department of health and the dairy department of the department of agriculture shall jointly adopt a set of uniform standards in relation to all matters falling within their joint jurisdiction regarding dairy products. The state department of health, district health units, municipal health departments or units, and the dairy department shall each be permitted to accept any inspection report of the other department or unit regarding the inspection of dairy products and the producers and processors of such products, when such report is based substantially upon standards conforming with the milk ordinance and code recommended by the United States public health service.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 184, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 23-0116; S.L. 1995, ch. 243, § 2.

Cross-References.

Dairy products regulation, see N.D.C.C. ch. 4-30.

Milk Stabilization Board, see N.D.C.C. ch. 4-18.1.

Municipal inspection of dairy products, see N.D.C.C. § 40-05-01.

23-01-16.
Dairy products — Joint standards.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

The department of health and human services and the dairy department of the department of agriculture shall jointly adopt a set of uniform standards in relation to all matters falling within their joint jurisdiction regarding dairy products. The department of health and human services, district health units, municipal health departments or units, and the dairy department shall each be permitted to accept any inspection report of the other department or unit regarding the inspection of dairy products and the producers and processors of such products, when such report is based substantially upon standards conforming with the milk ordinance and code recommended by the United States public health service.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 184, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 23-0116; S.L. 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2021, ch. 352, § 118, effective September 1, 2022.

23-01-17.
Noise harmful to health and safety — Power to regulate — Hearings — Appeal — Penalty — Injunction. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1991, ch. 264, § 1.

23-01-18.
State department of health responsible for control of rabies. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 243, § 2.

23-01-19.
Extermination of rabies. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 243, § 2.

23-01-20.
Traumatic head injury defined. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 231, § 1.

Note.

Section 2 of chapter 231, S.L. 1999, effective August 1, 1999, provides:

“

APPLICATION OF ACT.

This Act does not affect the confidentiality of any record received or created under former sections 23-01-20 and 23-01-21.”

23-01-21.
Central registry of traumatic head injury — Establishment — Reports. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 231, § 1.

Note.

Section 2 of chapter 231, S.L. 1999, effective August 1, 1999, provides:

“

APPLICATION OF ACT.

This Act does not affect the confidentiality of any record received or created under former sections 23-01-20 and 23-01-21.”

23-01-22.
Department to employ waste management facility inspectors.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

The state department of health shall employ and establish the qualifications, duties, and compensation of at least one full-time inspector for each commercial, nonpublicly owned waste management disposal or incineration facility that accepts more than twenty-five thousand tons [22679.5 kilograms] per year of hazardous waste, industrial waste, nuclear waste, or ash resulting from the incineration of municipal solid waste. This section does not apply to any energy conversion facility or coal mining operation that disposes of its solid waste onsite. The department may require inspectors for those facilities that accept less than twenty-five thousand tons [22679.5 kilograms] per year. The facility inspector shall conduct regular inspections of the operating procedure and conditions of the facility and report the findings to the department on a regular basis. If an inspector discovers a condition at a facility that is likely to cause imminent harm to the health and safety of the public or environment, the inspector shall notify the department. The department shall proceed as provided by sections 23-29-10 and 23-29-11.

The department shall assess the owner or operator of a waste management facility that accepts hazardous waste, industrial waste, nuclear waste, or ash resulting from the incineration of municipal solid waste an annual fee to pay the salaries, wages, and operating expenses associated with employing an inspector for the facility. The owner or operator of the facility shall submit the fee to the department by July first of each year. Any fees collected must be deposited in the department’s operating fund in the state treasury and any expenditures from the fund are subject to appropriation by the legislative assembly. If a facility begins operation after July first of any year, the owner or operator of the facility shall pay to the department a prorated fee for the fiscal year before the facility may begin accepting waste. Moneys in the waste management facility account may be spent by the department within the limits of legislative appropriation.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 248, § 1; 1995, ch. 243, § 2.

23-01-22.
Department to employ waste management facility inspectors.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

The department of health and human services shall employ and establish the qualifications, duties, and compensation of at least one full-time inspector for each commercial, nonpublicly owned waste management disposal or incineration facility that accepts more than twenty-five thousand tons [22679.5 kilograms] per year of hazardous waste, industrial waste, nuclear waste, or ash resulting from the incineration of municipal solid waste. This section does not apply to any energy conversion facility or coal mining operation that disposes of its solid waste onsite. The department may require inspectors for those facilities that accept less than twenty-five thousand tons [22679.5 kilograms] per year. The facility inspector shall conduct regular inspections of the operating procedure and conditions of the facility and report the findings to the department on a regular basis. If an inspector discovers a condition at a facility that is likely to cause imminent harm to the health and safety of the public or environment, the inspector shall notify the department. The department shall proceed as provided by sections 23-29-10 and 23-29-11.

The department shall assess the owner or operator of a waste management facility that accepts hazardous waste, industrial waste, nuclear waste, or ash resulting from the incineration of municipal solid waste an annual fee to pay the salaries, wages, and operating expenses associated with employing an inspector for the facility. The owner or operator of the facility shall submit the fee to the department by July first of each year. Any fees collected must be deposited in the department’s operating fund in the state treasury and any expenditures from the fund are subject to appropriation by the legislative assembly. If a facility begins operation after July first of any year, the owner or operator of the facility shall pay to the department a prorated fee for the fiscal year before the facility may begin accepting waste. Moneys in the waste management facility account may be spent by the department within the limits of legislative appropriation.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 248, § 1; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2021, ch. 352, § 119, effective September 1, 2022.

23-01-23.
Permit or investigatory hearings — Exemption from chapters 28-32 and 54-57. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 249, § 1; 1997, ch. 277, § 1; 2001, ch. 293, § 9; repealed by 2017, ch. 199, § 74, effective April 29, 2019.